California statutes. Labor Code
(c) Upon appointment, the mediator shall immediately schedule meetings at a time and location reasonably accessible to the parties. Mediation shall proceed for a period of 30 days. Upon expiration of the 30-day period, if the parties do not resolve the issues to their mutual satisfaction, the mediator shall certify that the mediation process has been exhausted. Upon mutual agreement of the parties, the mediator may extend the mediation
 period for an additional 30 days.

(d) Within 21 days, the mediator shall file a report with the board that resolves all of the issues between the parties and establishes the final terms of a collective bargaining agreement, including all issues subject to mediation and all issues resolved by the parties prior to the certification of the exhaustion of the mediation process. The report shall also include a statement of the entire economic value of the collective bargaining agreement as determined by stipulation of the parties or by the mediator. With respect to any issues in dispute between the parties, the report shall include the basis for the mediator’s determination. The mediator’s determination shall be supported by the record.

(e) In resolving the issues in dispute, the
 mediator may consider those factors commonly considered in similar proceedings, including:

(1) The stipulations of the parties.

(2) The financial condition of the employer and its ability to meet the costs of the contract in those instances where the employer claims an inability to meet the union’s wage and benefit demands.

(3) The corresponding wages, benefits, and terms and conditions of employment in other collective bargaining agreements covering similar agricultural operations with similar labor requirements.

(4) The corresponding wages, benefits, and terms and conditions of employment prevailing in comparable firms or industries in geographical areas with similar economic conditions, taking into account the size of the employer, the skills,
 experience, and training required of the employees, and the difficulty and nature of the work performed.

(5) The average consumer prices for goods and services according to the California Consumer Price Index, and the overall cost of living, in the area where the work is performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 16.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1164.3.

(a) Either party, within seven days of the filing of the report by the mediator, may petition the board for review of the report. The petitioning party shall, in the petition, specify the particular provisions of the mediator’s report for which it is seeking review by the board and shall specify the specific grounds authorizing review by the board. The board, within 10 days of receipt of a petition, may accept for review those portions of the petition for which a prima facie case has been established that (1) a provision of the collective bargaining agreement set forth in the mediator’s report is unrelated to wages, hours, or other conditions of employment within the meaning of Section 1155.2, (2) a provision of the collective bargaining agreement set forth in the mediator’s report is based on clearly erroneous findings of
 material fact, or (3) a provision of the collective bargaining agreement set forth in the mediator’s report is arbitrary or capricious in light of the mediator’s findings of fact.

(b) If it finds grounds exist to grant review within the meaning of subdivision (a), the board shall order the provisions of the report that are not the subject of the petition for review into effect as a final order of the board. If the board does not accept a petition for review or no petition for review is filed, then the mediator’s report shall become a final order of the board.

(c) The board shall issue a decision concerning the petition and if it determines that a provision of the collective bargaining agreement contained in the mediator’s report violates the provisions of subdivision (a), it shall, within 21 days, issue an order requiring the mediator to modify the terms of the collective
 bargaining agreement. The mediator shall meet with the parties for additional mediation for a period not to exceed 30 days. At the expiration of this mediation period, the mediator shall prepare a second report resolving any outstanding issues and that includes a statement of the entire economic value of the collective bargaining agreement as determined by stipulation of the parties or by the mediator. The second report shall be filed with the board.

(d) Either party, within seven days of the filing of the mediator’s second report, may petition the board for a review of the mediator’s second report pursuant to the procedures specified in subdivision (a). If no petition is filed, the mediator’s report shall take immediate effect as a final order of the board. If a petition is filed, the board shall issue an order confirming the mediator’s report and order it into immediate effect, unless it finds that the report is subject to review for any of the grounds specified in subdivision (a), in which case the board
 shall determine the issues and shall issue a final order of the board.

(e) Either party, within seven days of the filing of the report by the mediator, may petition the board to set aside the report if a prima facie case is established that any of the following have occurred: (1) the mediator’s report was procured by corruption, fraud, or other undue means, (2) there was corruption in the mediator, or (3) the rights of the petitioning party were substantially prejudiced by the misconduct of the mediator. For the sole purpose of interpreting the terms of paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), case law that interprets similar terms used in Section 1286.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply. If the board finds that any of these grounds exist, the board shall within 10 days vacate the report of the mediator and shall order the selection and appointment of a new mediator, and an additional mediation period of 30 days, pursuant to Section 1164.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding Section 1164.9, within 60 days after the order of the board takes effect, even if a party seeks to challenge, appeal, overturn, modify, or stay in any manner any order of the board under these provisions, either party or the board may file an action to enforce the order of the board, in the superior court for the County of Sacramento or in the county where either party’s principal place of business is located.

(2) To the extent that the board’s decision in Ace Tomato Co., Inc. (2012) 38 ALRB No. 8, states that a party cannot enforce a board order while an appeal or challenge to the board order in any form is pending, this section abrogates that decision. During the pendency of any challenge, appeal, writ of review, or other action seeking to modify or overturn a board order, the parties shall be required to implement the terms of the
 board’s order immediately upon issuance of the order.

(3) No final order of the board shall be stayed during any review under this chapter unless the court finds and states in its findings that (1) the appellant or petitioner has demonstrated, by clear and convincing evidence, that they will be irreparably harmed by the implementation of the board’s order, and (2) the appellant or petitioner has demonstrated, by clear and convincing evidence, a likelihood of success on appeal. For purposes of this section, the court deciding the stay shall provide written findings and analysis supporting the decision to grant a stay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 17.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1164.5.

(a) Within 30 days after the order of the board takes effect, a party may petition for a writ of review in the court of appeal or the California Supreme Court. If the writ issues, it shall be made returnable at a time and place specified by court order and shall direct the board to certify its record in the case to the court within the time specified. The petition for review shall be served personally upon the executive director of the board and the nonappealing party personally or by service.

(b) The review by the court shall not extend further than to determine, on the basis of the entire record, whether any of the following occurred:

(1) The board acted
 without, or in excess of, its powers or jurisdiction.

(2) The board has not proceeded in the manner required by law.

(3) The order or decision of the board was procured by fraud or was an abuse of discretion.

(4) The order or decision of the board violates any right of the petitioner under the Constitution of the United States or the California Constitution.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the court to hold a trial de novo, to take evidence other than as specified by the California Rules of Court, or to exercise its independent judgment on the evidence.

(d) An employer who seeks
 review of a final order of the board pursuant to this chapter ordering into effect the terms of a mediator’s report establishing the terms of a collective bargaining agreement between the employer and a labor organization, or who otherwise appeals, petitions, or seeks to overturn or stay or modify any order of the board pursuant to this chapter, shall first post a bond with the board in the amount of the entire economic value of the contract as determined by the board as a condition to filing a petition for a writ of review or other court filing to ensure that employees or the labor organization receive the economic benefits of the contract if the employer does not prevail. The employer shall post the bond with the board within 30 days after the order of the board takes effect. The court shall dismiss any petition for a writ of review or other court filing where the petitioning employer did not timely comply with this subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, the “entire economic value of the contract”
 means the difference between the employees’ existing wages and economic benefits and those set forth in the contract.

(e) The bond required under subdivision (d) shall consist of an appeal bond issued by a licensed surety or a cash deposit with the board in the amount specified in subdivision (d). The employer shall provide written notification to the labor organization of the posting of the bond and shall also provide notice to the court at the time of the filing of the petition for a writ of review or other court filing. The bond shall be on the condition that, if the petition or other court filing is withdrawn, dismissed, or denied or if judgment is otherwise entered against the employer, the employer shall pay the amount owed pursuant to the board’s order or the judgment of the court if in a different amount, unless the employer and
 labor organization have executed a settlement agreement for payment of some other amount, in which case the employer shall pay the amount that the employer is obligated to pay under the terms of the settlement agreement. If the employer fails to pay the amount owed within 10 days of finality of the review proceeding or the execution of a settlement agreement, a portion of the bond equal to the amount owed, or the entire bond if the amount owed exceeds the bond, is forfeited to the board for appropriate distribution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 18.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1164.7.

(a) The board and each party to the action or proceeding before the mediator may appear in the review proceeding. Upon the hearing, the court of appeal or the Supreme Court shall enter judgment either affirming or setting aside the order of the board.

(b) The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to writs of review shall, so far as applicable, apply to proceedings instituted under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1145, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1164.9.

No court of this state, except the court of appeal or the Supreme Court, to the extent specified in this article, shall have jurisdiction to review, reverse, correct, or annul any order or decision of the board to suspend or delay the execution or operation thereof, or to enjoin, restrain, or interfere with the board in the performance of its official duties, as provided by law and the rules of court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1145, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1164.10.

(a) At the conclusion of any review proceedings commenced under this chapter in which the board’s order is affirmed, and the terms set forth in the board’s order are not implemented or effective, the agricultural employer and the labor organization shall immediately implement the board’s order if the order has not already been implemented.

(b) If a collective bargaining agreement in a mediator’s report adopted as a final board order includes a duration provision setting a term for the agreement that has since expired during the course of any review proceedings, or other provisions that have become outdated or otherwise moot as a result of the passage of time during the course of review proceedings, either the agricultural employer or labor
 organization may file a request with the board for referral to mandatory mediation and conciliation with the original mediator that decided the disputed issues for purposes of updating those specific provisions. If that mediator is unavailable, the parties may agree to another mediator or the board shall request a list of mediators in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1164, and the parties shall be required to select a mediator within 48 hours of receipt of the mediator list, exclusive of weekends or holidays. Any request for referral to mediation shall be filed within 15 days after any judicial review proceedings become final. Any supplemental mandatory mediation and conciliation proceedings provided for in this section shall not extend to any other issues.

(c) Mandatory mediation and conciliation proceedings ordered by the board under subdivision (b) shall be in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, as applicable, except as
 provided in this subdivision. The mediation under this section shall be scheduled within seven days of the selection or reselection of the mediator. For purposes of complying with this seven-day period, the mediation may occur by telephone if so ordered by the mediator and the parties may submit their written positions and evidence electronically to the mediator. The mediator shall have 10 days to issue an order on the issues in dispute. The review provisions contained in Sections 1164.3 and 1164.5 shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.   (AB 2751)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1164.11.

A demand made pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1164 may be made only in cases which meet all of the following criteria: (a) the parties have failed to reach agreement for at least one year after the date on which the labor organization made its initial request to bargain, (b) the employer has committed an unfair labor practice, and (c) the parties have not previously had a binding contract between them.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1145) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1146, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1164.12.

To ensure an orderly implementation of the mediation process ordered by this chapter, a party may not file a total of more than 75 declarations with the board prior to January 1, 2008. In calculating the number of declarations so filed, the identity of the other party with respect to whom the declaration is filed, shall be irrelevant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 870, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1164.13.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1145, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Suits Involving Employers and Labor Organizations [1165. - 1165.4.]

1165.

(a) Suits for violation of contracts between an agricultural employer and an agricultural labor organization representing agricultural employees, as defined in this part, or between any such labor organizations, may be brought in any superior court having jurisdiction of the parties, without respect to the amount in controversy.

(b) Any agricultural labor organization which represents agricultural employees and any agricultural employer shall be bound by the acts of its agents. Any such labor organization may sue or be sued as an entity and in behalf of the employees whom it represents in the courts of this state. Any money judgment against a labor organization in a superior court shall be enforceable only against the organization as an entity and against its assets, and shall not be enforceable against any individual member or his assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1165.2.

For the purpose of this part, the superior court shall have jurisdiction over a labor organization in this state if such organization maintains its principal office in this state, or if its duly authorized officers or agents are engaged in representing or acting for employee members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1165.3.

The service of summons, subpoena, or other legal process of any superior court upon an officer or agent of a labor organization, in his capacity as such, shall constitute service upon the labor organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1165.4.

For the purpose of this part, in determining whether any person is acting as an agent of another person so as to make such other person responsible for his acts, the question of whether the specific acts performed were actually authorized or subsequently ratified shall not be controlling.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Limitations [1166. - 1166.3.]

1166.

Nothing in this part, except as specifically provided for herein, shall be construed so as either to interfere with or impede or diminish in any way the right to strike, or to affect the limitations or qualifications on such right.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1166.2.

Nothing in this part shall prohibit any individual employed as a supervisor from becoming or remaining a member of a labor organization, but no employer subject to this part shall be compelled to deem individuals defined herein as supervisors as employees for the purpose of any law, either national or local, relating to collective bargaining.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1166.3.

(a) If any provision of this part, or the application of such provision to any person or circumstances, shall be held invalid, the remainder of this part, or the application of such provision to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid, shall not be affected thereby.

(b) If any other act of the Legislature shall conflict with the provisions of this part, this part shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. EMPLOYEES [1171. - 1413.]



  CHAPTER 1. Wages, Hours and Working Conditions [1171. - 1207.]

1171.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to and include men, women and minors employed in any occupation, trade, or industry, whether compensation is measured by time, piece, or otherwise, but shall not include any individual employed as an outside salesman or any individual participating in a national service program carried out using assistance provided under Section 12571 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

Any individual participating in a national service program pursuant to Section 12571 of Title 42 of the United States Code shall be informed by the nonprofit, educational institution or other entity using his or her service, prior to the commencement of service of the requirement, if any, to work hours in excess of eight hours per day, or 40 hours per week, or both, and shall have the opportunity to opt out of that national service program at that time. Individuals participating in a national service program pursuant to Section 12571 of Title 42 of the United States Code shall not be discriminated against or be denied continued participation in the program for refusing to work overtime for a legitimate reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 365, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.5.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) All protections, rights, and remedies available under state law, except any reinstatement remedy prohibited by federal law, are available to all individuals regardless of immigration status who have applied for employment, or who are or who have been employed, in this state.

(b) For purposes of enforcing state labor, employment, civil rights, consumer protection, and housing
 laws, a person’s immigration status is irrelevant to the issue of liability, and in proceedings or discovery undertaken to enforce those state laws no inquiry shall be permitted into a person’s immigration status unless the person seeking to make this inquiry has shown by clear and convincing evidence that the inquiry is necessary in order to comply with federal immigration law.

(c) The provisions of this section are declaratory of existing law.

(d) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 160, Sec. 4.   (AB 1690)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1173.

It is the continuing duty of the Industrial Welfare Commission, hereinafter referred to in this chapter as the commission, to ascertain the wages paid to all employees in this state, to ascertain the hours and conditions of labor and employment in the various occupations, trades, and industries in which employees are employed in this state, and to investigate the health, safety, and welfare of those employees.

The commission shall conduct a full review of the adequacy of the minimum wage at least once every two years. The commission may, upon its own motion or upon petition, amend or rescind any order or portion of any order or adopt an order covering any occupation, trade, or industry not covered by an existing order pursuant to this chapter.

Before adopting any new rules, regulations, or policies, the commission shall consult with the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board to determine those areas and subject matters where the respective jurisdictions of the commission and the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board overlap. This consultation need not take the form of a joint meeting. In the case of such overlapping jurisdiction, the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board shall have exclusive jurisdiction, and rules, regulations, or policies of the commission on the same subject have no force or effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 150, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.

Every person employing labor in this state shall:

(a) Furnish to the commission, at its request, reports or information that the commission requires to carry out this chapter. The reports and information shall be verified if required by the commission or any member thereof.

(b) Allow any member of the commission or the employees of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement free access to the place of business or employment of the person to secure any information or make any investigation that they are authorized by this chapter to ascertain or make. The commission may inspect or make excerpts, relating to the employment of employees, from
 the books, reports, contracts, payrolls, documents, or papers of the person.

(c) Keep a record showing the names and addresses of all employees employed and the ages of all minors.

(d) Keep, at a central location in the state or at the plants or establishments at which employees are employed, payroll records showing the hours worked daily by and the wages paid to, and the number of piece-rate units earned by and any applicable piece rate paid to, employees employed at the respective plants or establishments. These records shall be kept in accordance with rules established for this purpose by the commission, but in any case shall be kept on file for not less than three years. An employer shall not prohibit an employee from maintaining a personal record of hours worked, or, if paid on a piece-rate basis, piece-rate units earned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 655, Sec. 7.   (AB 469)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.1.

(a) Any employer, or other person or entity, who may be liable for a violation of any provision of this code shall be precluded from introducing as evidence, in an administrative proceeding contesting a citation or writ proceeding under Section 558, 1197.1, 2673.1, or 2673.2, books, documents, or records, as specified in subdivision (b), that are not provided pursuant to a duly served written request by the Labor Commissioner under this section within the time the Labor Commissioner requests those books, documents, or records be produced, pursuant to either of the following:

(1) When the Labor Commissioner provides for no less than 15 days to respond, subject to the exceptions under subdivision (c), (d), (e), or (g).

(2) When the Labor Commissioner provides for less than 15 days to respond, subject to the exceptions under subdivision (c) or (e), if the Labor Commissioner, in their discretion, determines that circumstances exist that make it necessary to require a shorter period of production for the Labor Commissioner to conduct a complete investigation. In this instance, a statement indicating that determination of necessity shall be included with the written request from the Labor Commissioner.

(b) The books, documents, or records to which this section applies are payroll, time, and employment records that are required to be maintained at the place of employment or at a central location within the state by the employer, including, but not limited to, under Sections 226, 247.5, 1174, 2052, and 2673, and Section 6 or 7 (“Records”) of any order of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply in the event that the person or entity subject to the written request by the Labor Commissioner for the production of books, documents, or records opposes such a request in court, prior to the issuance of any citation under Section 558 or 1197.1, and a court determines that the books, documents, or records are not required to be produced.

(d) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not apply to the failure to produce any books, documents, or records within the time requested by the Labor Commissioner if such failure is due to an inadvertent error, provided that such error is corrected and the books, documents, or records are produced to the Labor Commissioner no later than 20 days from the date originally requested. For purposes of this section, “inadvertent error” means any clerical mistake causing an unintended delay in production of the requested
 books, documents, or records.

(e) The Labor Commissioner shall take into consideration a reasonable request from the person or entity subject to subdivision (a) for an extension on the time for production of books, documents, or records. The commissioner shall determine the reasonableness of the request and may consider, among other things, the location of the books, documents, or records and the volume of production. The Labor Commissioner, in their discretion, may admit and consider books, documents, or records that are produced beyond the time limits provided for in this section upon a finding that both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person or entity cooperated with the underlying investigation and substantially complied with the request within the time limit prescribed.

(2) The person or
 entity made good faith efforts to comply with the request, including discovery of the late-produced books, documents, or records.

(f) Service of a written request for books, documents, or records on a corporation or limited liability company shall be in the same manner as provided for service of a summons as described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(g) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and notwithstanding subdivision (e), a person or entity that provides a timely good faith response to the Labor Commissioner that additional time is needed to gather requested books, documents, or records, shall be provided an automatic extension of 15 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 329, Sec. 2.   (SB 62)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.5.

Any person employing labor who willfully fails to maintain the records required by subdivision (c) of Section 1174 or accurate and complete records required by subdivision (d) of Section 1174, or to allow any member of the commission or employees of the division to inspect records pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1174, shall be subject to a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 123.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1175.

Any person, or officer or agent thereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor who:

(a) Neglects or refuses to furnish the information requested under the provisions of Section 1174.

(b) Refuses access to his place of business or employment to any member of the commission or employee of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement when administering or enforcing this chapter.

(c) Hinders such member, or employee in securing information authorized by Section 1174.

(d) Fails to keep any of the records required by Section 1174.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

1176.

The commission or any members thereof may subpena witnesses and administer oaths. All witnesses subpenaed by the commission shall be paid the fees and mileage fixed by law in civil cases. In case of the failure of a person to comply with an order or subpena of the commission or any member thereof, or in the case of the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he may lawfully be interrogated before any wage board or the commission, it shall be the duty of the superior court or judge thereof, on the application of a member of the commission, to compel obedience in a manner by which such obedience could be compelled in a proceeding pending before the court.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1177 by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------

1176.1.

Any interested party may petition the commission requesting the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation. The petition shall state clearly and concisely all of the following:

(a) The substance or nature of the regulation, amendment, or repeal that is requested.

(b) The reason for the request.

(c) Reference to the commission’s authority to take the action that is requested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 863, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1176.3.

(a) Within 120 days of the receipt of a petition requesting the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation, the commission shall notify the petitioner in writing of the receipt of the petition, set the matter for consideration at a public meeting, and issue a written decision taking one of the following actions:

(1) Setting the matter for public hearing pursuant to Section 1178 or 1178.5. 

(2) Denying the petition. A decision denying a petition shall include a statement explaining the reasons for the denial.

(b) The petitioner may request reconsideration of any part or all of a decision denying a petition pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1176.3. The commission’s reconsideration of any matter relating to a petition shall be subject to subdivision (a), except that a decision to deny reconsideration shall be final.

(c) In cases where a petition is referred to a wage board, the commission shall complete its final actions on the petition within 90 days after completion of the public hearing process pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1178.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 863, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1177.

(a) The commission may make and enforce rules of practice and procedure and shall not be bound by the rules of evidence. Each order of the commission shall be concurred in by a majority of the commissioners.

(b) The commission shall prepare a statement as to the basis upon which an adopted or amended order is predicated. The statement shall be concurred in by a majority of the commissioners. The commission shall publish a copy of the statement with the order in the California Regulatory Notice Register. The commission also shall provide a copy of the statement to any interested party upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1178.

If after investigation the commission finds that in any occupation, trade, or industry, the wages paid to employees may be inadequate to supply the cost of proper living, or that the hours or conditions of labor may be prejudicial to the health, morals, or welfare of employees, the commission shall select a wage board to consider any of such matters and transmit to such wage board the information supporting its findings gathered in the investigation. Such investigation shall include at least one public hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

1178.5.

(a) If the commission finds that wages paid to employees may be inadequate to supply the cost of proper living, it shall select one wage board composed of an equal number of representatives of employers and employees, and a nonvoting representative of the commission, designated by the commission, who shall act as chairperson. The wage board shall consider the findings of the commission and such other information it deems appropriate and report to the commission its recommendation of a minimum wage adequate to supply the necessary cost of proper living to, and maintain the health and welfare of employees in this state, and its recommendations on such other matters related to the minimum wage on which the commission has requested recommendations.

(b) If the commission finds that hours or conditions of labor may be prejudicial to the health or welfare of employees in any occupation, trade, or industry, it shall select a wage board composed of an equal number of representatives of employers and employees in the occupation, trade, or industry in question, and a nonvoting representative of the commission, designated by the commission, who shall act as chairperson. The wage board shall consider the findings of the commission and such other information it deems appropriate and report to the commission its recommendation as to what action should be taken by the commission with respect to the matter under consideration.

(c) Prior to amending or rescinding any existing order or adopting any new order, and after receipt of the wage board report and recommendation, the commission shall prepare proposed regulations with respect to the matter under consideration. The proposed regulations shall include any recommendation of the wage board which received the support of at least two-thirds of the members of the wage board. A public hearing on the proposed regulations shall be held in each of at least three cities in this state, except when the proposed regulations would affect only an occupation, trade, or industry which is not statewide in scope, in which case a public hearing shall be held in the locality in which the occupation, trade, or industry prevails. The proceedings shall be recorded and transcribed and shall thereafter be a matter of public record.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

1179.

The members of the wage board shall be allowed fifty dollars ($50) per diem and necessary traveling expenses while engaged in such conferences. The commission shall make rules governing the number and selection of the members and the mode of procedure of the wage board, and shall exercise exclusive jurisdiction over all questions as to the validity of the procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.

The proceedings and deliberations of the wage board shall be made a matter of record for the use of the commission, and shall be admissible as evidence in any proceedings before the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1181 by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------

1181.

Upon the fixing of the time and place for the holding of a hearing for the purpose of considering and acting upon the proposed regulations or any matters referred to in Sections 1176 to 1180, inclusive, the commission shall:

(a) Give public notice thereof by advertisement in at least one newspaper published in each of the cities of Los Angeles, Oakland, Sacramento, San Jose, Fresno, Eureka, San Diego, Long Beach, Alameda, Berkeley, Stockton, San Bernardino, and San Francisco.

(b) Mail a copy of the notice and the proposed regulations to the clerk of the superior court of each county in the state to be posted at the courthouse; to each association of employers or employees which, in the opinion of the commission, would be affected by the hearing; and to any person or organization within this state filing with the commission a written request for notice of such hearing. Failure to mail such notice shall not invalidate any order of the commission issued after such hearing.

The notice shall also state the time and place fixed for the hearing, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of publication and mailing of such notices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 523.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.

(a) After receipt of the wage board report and the public hearings on the proposed regulations, the commission may, upon its own motion, amend or rescind an existing order or promulgate a new order. However, with respect to proposed regulations based on recommendations supported by at least two-thirds of the members of the wage board, the commission shall adopt such proposed regulations, unless it finds there is no substantial evidence to support such recommendations.
